dict-sa-Deva/sa-Deva.aff
# Sanskrit Dictionary in Hunspell format
# generated by ShreeDevi Kumar
# on Feb 25, 2017.
#
# This hunspell dictionary is based on resources from Gérard Huet's
# "Héritage du Sanskrit"  site. (http://sanskrit.inria.fr/goldendict.html) 
# under the terms of the Attribution-NonCommercial 4.0 International Creative Commons license.

SET UTF-8
LANG hi_IN

TRY ्ायतिरमवेनसकषुपअहदलशथधीणजःचोगभटूृबडखंैङञघछठआफौउझइईएऊढऋऔओऐॄॢॐऌॠ
KEY इई|उऊ|ऑऒओऔॵ|ऄऍऎएऐ|िी|ुू|ॅॆेै|ॉॊोौॏ|डङ|धघ|मभय|बव|ंँ

MAXNGRAMSUGS 10
MAXDIFF 5

ICONV 4
ICONV ॅं ँ
ICONV ाॅ ॉ
ICONV अॉ ऑ
ICONV अॅ ॲ

REP 6
REP र् र्‍
REP र्‍ र् 
REP म् ं
REP ं म्
REP श ष
REP ष श


MAP 1
MAP लळ

BREAK 4
BREAK _
BREAK -
BREAK ˆ-
BREAK -$

FLAG NUM
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 0  .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 अ .
SFX 3655 Y 1
SFX 3655 0 द् .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 ए .
SFX 3526 Y 1
SFX 3526 0 ह् .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 इ .
SFX 3992 Y 1
SFX 3992 0 ज् .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 म् .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 न् .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 ओ .
SFX 938 Y 1
SFX 938 0 स् .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 त् .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 उ .
SFX 2574 Y 1
SFX 2574 0 अयिष्यद्भ्यः .
SFX 4381 Y 1
SFX 4381 0 षाः .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 तम् .
SFX 2731 Y 1
SFX 2731 0 तस् .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 0 तौ .
SFX 2878 Y 1
SFX 2878 0 मेषु .
SFX 1166 Y 1
SFX 1166 0 ईयायाः .
SFX 3290 Y 1
SFX 3290 0 फलैः .
SFX 2540 Y 1
SFX 2540 0 नायै .
SFX 3948 Y 1
SFX 3948 0 कर्माणि .
SFX 2558 Y 1
SFX 2558 0 अयिष्यन्त्यः .
SFX 2396 Y 1
SFX 2396 0 अयितव्यतः .
SFX 2100 Y 1
SFX 2100 0 ष्यन्तीभ्याम् .
SFX 3812 Y 1
SFX 3812 0 रिभिः .
SFX 1796 Y 1
SFX 1796 0 मयस्य .
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 0 अयत .
SFX 2419 Y 1
SFX 2419 0 अयते .
SFX 2370 Y 1
SFX 2370 0 अयति .
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 0 अयतु .
SFX 2401 Y 1
SFX 2401 0 अयितव्यम् .
SFX 2395 Y 1
SFX 2395 0 अयितव्यौ .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 ईयेन .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 0 मानाम् .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 मानान् .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 मानात् .
SFX 428 Y 1
SFX 428 0 न्त्या .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 ईनाम् .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 टयोः .
SFX 4191 Y 1
SFX 4191 0 न्तयोः .
SFX 2222 Y 1
SFX 2222 0 ष्यन्ते .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 ष्यन्ति .
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 0 तव्येभ्यः .
SFX 1879 Y 1
SFX 1879 0 यितव्यैः .
SFX 4423 Y 1
SFX 4423 0 भृतः .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 अणयोः .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 त्वयोः .
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 0 तेन .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 अमान .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 अमाने .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 ष्यमाणाय .
SFX 4454 Y 1
SFX 4454 0 धम् .
SFX 3418 Y 1
SFX 3418 0 धौ .
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 0 तव्यायाः .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 आहात्म्यानाम् .
SFX 1830 Y 1
SFX 1830 0 णीयाय .
SFX 1975 Y 1
SFX 1975 0 यिष्यतोः .
SFX 1643 Y 1
SFX 1643 0 आणानि .
SFX 2238 Y 1
SFX 2238 0 ष्यध्वे .
SFX 2867 Y 1
SFX 2867 0 कृत .
SFX 1925 Y 1
SFX 1925 0 कृते .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 कृति .
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 0 भावाय .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 ष्यद्भ्यः .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 0 आणाभिः .
SFX 1768 Y 1
SFX 1768 0 लः .
SFX 2528 Y 1
SFX 2528 0 मताम् .
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 0 पानाम् .
SFX 2746 Y 1
SFX 2746 0 अयेथे .
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 0 आलाभ्याम् .
SFX 4965 Y 1
SFX 4965 0 रसाः .
SFX 4466 Y 1
SFX 4466 0 रीभ्याम् .
SFX 3567 Y 1
SFX 3567 0 तन्त्रयोः .
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 0 नीया .
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 0 ज्ञेषु .
SFX 3043 Y 1
SFX 3043 0 इकाम् .
SFX 4975 Y 1
SFX 4975 0 इकात् .
SFX 4790 Y 1
SFX 4790 0 मालायाम् .
SFX 4627 Y 1
SFX 4627 0 पत्त्रैः .
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 0 अयिष्यमाणायै .
SFX 4596 Y 1
SFX 4596 0 तकम् .
SFX 1165 Y 1
SFX 1165 0 ईयायै .
SFX 3369 Y 1
SFX 3369 0 देवम् .
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 0 देवौ .
SFX 350 Y 1
SFX 350 0 मानाः .
SFX 2470 Y 1
SFX 2470 0 अयता .
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 0 अयती .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 अनीययोः .
SFX 3717 Y 1
SFX 3717 0 भूतेन .
SFX 3152 Y 1
SFX 3152 0 अत्योः .
SFX 2629 Y 1
SFX 2629 0 अयिष्यमाणासु .
SFX 4785 Y 1
SFX 4785 0 ष्टेभ्यः .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 0 रेण .
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 0 यः .
SFX 3724 Y 1
SFX 3724 0 भूतैः .
SFX 4040 Y 1
SFX 4040 0 दा .
SFX 4926 Y 1
SFX 4926 0 दी .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 काभ्याम् .
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 0 सम् .
SFX 2259 Y 1
SFX 2259 0 सौ .
SFX 3554 Y 1
SFX 3554 0 पुरस्य .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 वनाय .
SFX 2235 Y 1
SFX 2235 0 दाः .
SFX 1855 Y 1
SFX 1855 0 तव्यानि .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 अनीयाभ्यः .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 0 देभ्यः .
SFX 3376 Y 1
SFX 3376 0 उखेभ्यः .
SFX 3147 Y 1
SFX 3147 0 सानाम् .
SFX 1433 Y 1
SFX 1433 0 तवत्याम् .
SFX 4110 Y 1
SFX 4110 0 स्थाय .
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 0 अनाः .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 तकयोः .
SFX 2643 Y 1
SFX 2643 0 अयिष्यध्वे .
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 0 अयिष्यमाणेभ्यः .
SFX 1988 Y 1
SFX 1988 0 यिष्यन्त्याः .
SFX 4951 Y 1
SFX 4951 0 लक्षणानि .
SFX 3653 Y 1
SFX 3653 0 क्षाः .
SFX 3876 Y 1
SFX 3876 0 दीपिकाभिः .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 यितव्याभिः .
SFX 2622 Y 1
SFX 2622 0 अयिष्यमाणायाः .
SFX 4244 Y 1
SFX 4244 0 पत्त्राभ्याम् .
SFX 3252 Y 1
SFX 3252 0 कारस्य .
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 0 यमाणया .
SFX 4233 Y 1
SFX 4233 0 ल्याः .
SFX 3565 Y 1
SFX 3565 0 तन्त्रेभ्यः .
SFX 3040 Y 1
SFX 3040 0 पाभ्याम् .
SFX 3456 Y 1
SFX 3456 0 राजाय .
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 0 वानाम् .
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 0 यितव्य .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 यितव्ये .
SFX 4285 Y 1
SFX 4285 0 नाथैः .
SFX 4321 Y 1
SFX 4321 0 ष्ट .
SFX 3540 Y 1
SFX 3540 0 ष्टे .
SFX 4884 Y 1
SFX 4884 0 यं .
SFX 3581 Y 1
SFX 3581 0 सङ्ग्रहेण .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 यिष्यमाणाम् .
SFX 2042 Y 1
SFX 2042 0 यिष्यमाणान् .
SFX 2037 Y 1
SFX 2037 0 यिष्यमाणात् .
SFX 4661 Y 1
SFX 4661 0 भाष्यस्य .
SFX 2742 Y 1
SFX 2742 0 मन्तः .
SFX 2213 Y 1
SFX 2213 0 ष्यमाणाभ्याम् .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 इष्यत्सु .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 0 फलानि .
SFX 4259 Y 1
SFX 4259 0 उखेन .
SFX 4914 Y 1
SFX 4914 0 रहस्यम् .
SFX 4252 Y 1
SFX 4252 0 लाभ्यः .
SFX 1074 Y 1
SFX 1074 0 ईयाय .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 वतीभ्याम् .
SFX 1522 Y 1
SFX 1522 0 इतवतीभिः .
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 0 याम .
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 0 यामि .
SFX 3817 Y 1
SFX 3817 0 वृत्तिम् .
SFX 3398 Y 1
SFX 3398 0 पद्धतीः .
SFX 4973 Y 1
SFX 4973 0 इकेषु .
SFX 772 Y 1
SFX 772 0 णेन .
SFX 4918 Y 1
SFX 4918 0 लीः .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 टतः .
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 0 न्ततः .
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 0 न्ताय .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 केन .
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 0 तवतीम् .
SFX 333 Y 1
SFX 333 0 तोः .
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 0 यमाणस्य .
SFX 3689 Y 1
SFX 3689 0 लानि .
SFX 3240 Y 1
SFX 3240 0 कृतेषु .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 नेभ्यः .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 भिः .
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 0 अयिष्यन्त्याम् .
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 0 पतितः .
SFX 1476 Y 1
SFX 1476 0 इष्यमाणाभिः .
SFX 4803 Y 1
SFX 4803 0 कारिभिः .
SFX 3579 Y 1
SFX 3579 0 सूत्र .
SFX 4099 Y 1
SFX 4099 0 सूत्रे .
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 0 णीयाः .
SFX 2009 Y 1
SFX 2009 0 णीः .
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 0 अयितव्याय .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 त्वेषु .
SFX 3945 Y 1
SFX 3945 0 ङ्गैः .
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 0 यानाम् .
SFX 2480 Y 1
SFX 2480 0 नायाः .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 आ .
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 0 ई .
SFX 4195 Y 1
SFX 4195 0 मुखानाम् .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 0 आयाम् .
SFX 4967 Y 1
SFX 4967 0 मन्त्रम् .
SFX 3249 Y 1
SFX 3249 0 कारयोः .
SFX 3407 Y 1
SFX 3407 0 पद्धतयः .
SFX 4969 Y 1
SFX 4969 0 कारिणे .
SFX 4860 Y 1
SFX 4860 0 कारिणि .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 आनम् .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 आनौ .
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 0 मानाभिः .
SFX 3847 Y 1
SFX 3847 0 मुखः .
SFX 4176 Y 1
SFX 4176 0 धराय .
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 0 यिष्यन्तीम् .
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 रम् .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 रन् .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 रौ .
SFX 4326 Y 1
SFX 4326 0 ङ्गः .
SFX 4771 Y 1
SFX 4771 0 गताभ्याम् .
SFX 3636 Y 1
SFX 3636 0 करणाय .
SFX 4394 Y 1
SFX 4394 0 अन्त्रयोः .
SFX 4336 Y 1
SFX 4336 0 ष्टयोः .
SFX 3523 Y 1
SFX 3523 0 सेभ्यः .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 णाभ्याम् .
SFX 565 Y 1
SFX 565 0 यानि .
SFX 656 Y 1
SFX 656 0 व्याय .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 माणयोः .
SFX 4728 Y 1
SFX 4728 0 विद् .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 0 दस्य .
SFX 2399 Y 1
SFX 2399 0 अयितव्यानाम् .
SFX 3387 Y 1
SFX 3387 0 र्याः .
SFX 1639 Y 1
SFX 1639 0 तव्य .
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 0 तव्ये .
SFX 2476 Y 1
SFX 2476 0 वैः .
SFX 364 Y 1
SFX 364 0 मानायै .
SFX 4011 Y 1
SFX 4011 0 पुत्रः .
SFX 2236 Y 1
SFX 2236 0 ष्येथे .
SFX 4805 Y 1
SFX 4805 0 जन .
SFX 3105 Y 1
SFX 3105 0 अयमानाय .
SFX 4503 Y 1
SFX 4503 0 रूपाभ्याम् .
SFX 1521 Y 1
SFX 1521 0 इतवतीभ्यः .
SFX 4636 Y 1
SFX 4636 0 कल्पम् .
SFX 4715 Y 1
SFX 4715 0 कल्पौ .
SFX 3385 Y 1
SFX 3385 0 देवः .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 लिभ्याम् .
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 0 अनीयतः .
SFX 3300 Y 1
SFX 3300 0 कर्मभिः .
SFX 4738 Y 1
SFX 4738 0 र्थेभ्यः .
SFX 2983 Y 1
SFX 2983 0 विधेः .
SFX 4163 Y 1
SFX 4163 0 स्थान् .
SFX 4111 Y 1
SFX 4111 0 स्थात् .
SFX 3048 Y 1
SFX 3048 0 तीर्थानाम् .
SFX 4343 Y 1
SFX 4343 0 पदाय .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 शाः .
SFX 4416 Y 1
SFX 4416 0 ऊ .
SFX 4174 Y 1
SFX 4174 0 धरेण .
SFX 1631 Y 1
SFX 1631 0 अमानैः .
SFX 2076 Y 1
SFX 2076 0 ष्यता .
SFX 2086 Y 1
SFX 2086 0 ष्यती .
SFX 3537 Y 1
SFX 3537 0 थाभ्याम् .
SFX 1124 Y 1
SFX 1124 0 अन्त्यः .
SFX 922 Y 1
SFX 922 0 ईय .
SFX 1069 Y 1
SFX 1069 0 ईये .
SFX 2408 Y 1
SFX 2408 0 साम् .
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 0 सान् .
SFX 3345 Y 1
SFX 3345 0 सात् .
SFX 1974 Y 1
SFX 1974 0 यिष्यत्सु .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 0 आहात्म्येषु .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 काणि .
SFX 3395 Y 1
SFX 3395 0 पद्धतिषु .
SFX 3059 Y 1
SFX 3059 0 श्वराभ्याम् .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 तवद्भ्यः .
SFX 2807 Y 1
SFX 2807 0 अणानि .
SFX 4450 Y 1
SFX 4450 0 लक्षणम् .
SFX 4322 Y 1
SFX 4322 0 रूप .
SFX 4500 Y 1
SFX 4500 0 रूपे .
SFX 3497 Y 1
SFX 3497 0 साय .
SFX 3346 Y 1
SFX 3346 0 पेषु .
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 0 लिषु .
SFX 3598 Y 1
SFX 3598 0 र्यः .
SFX 3025 Y 1
SFX 3025 0 माहात्म्यानाम् .
SFX 1634 Y 1
SFX 1634 0 अमानाभ्याम् .
SFX 1290 Y 1
SFX 1290 0 इतव्या .
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 0 न्तीषु .
SFX 3512 Y 1
SFX 3512 0 स्तोत्रेण .
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 0 यिष्यताम् .
SFX 1363 Y 1
SFX 1363 0 इष्यन्तीभिः .
SFX 1272 Y 1
SFX 1272 0 तवान् .
SFX 4417 Y 1
SFX 4417 0 तक .
SFX 4540 Y 1
SFX 4540 0 तके .
SFX 4057 Y 1
SFX 4057 0 र्मभ्यः .
SFX 2780 Y 1
SFX 2780 0 भावेभ्यः .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 देवयोः .
SFX 2033 Y 1
SFX 2033 0 यिष्यमाणया .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 मानयोः .
SFX 3740 Y 1
SFX 3740 0 प्रयोगेभ्यः .
SFX 1715 Y 1
SFX 1715 0 यावः .
SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 0 पालेभ्यः .
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 0 यमानायाम् .
SFX 3568 Y 1
SFX 3568 0 तन्त्राय .
SFX 543 Y 1
SFX 543 0 आनः .
SFX 3505 Y 1
SFX 3505 0 आलानाम् .
SFX 4666 Y 1
SFX 4666 0 अतीम् .
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 0 अनीया .
SFX 4418 Y 1
SFX 4418 0 रये .
SFX 1293 Y 1
SFX 1293 0 एयाथाम् .
SFX 4347 Y 1
SFX 4347 0 मयेण .
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 0 निर्णय .
SFX 3595 Y 1
SFX 3595 0 सङ्ग्रहः .
SFX 2139 Y 1
SFX 2139 0 णीयायै .
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 0 कारान् .
SFX 3251 Y 1
SFX 3251 0 कारात् .
SFX 1660 Y 1
SFX 1660 0 आणासु .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 0 यमाणैः .
SFX 3075 Y 1
SFX 3075 0 तीर्थेभ्यः .
SFX 4668 Y 1
SFX 4668 0 अतीभ्यः .
SFX 3197 Y 1
SFX 3197 0 कृद्भिः .
SFX 1832 Y 1
SFX 1832 0 णीयम् .
SFX 1846 Y 1
SFX 1846 0 णीयौ .
SFX 3509 Y 1
SFX 3509 0 त्राभ्याम् .
SFX 1457 Y 1
SFX 1457 0 इतवद्भिः .
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 0 टेन .
SFX 4428 Y 1
SFX 4428 0 भैः .
SFX 1129 Y 1
SFX 1129 0 अन्तीषु .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 यिष्यमाणस्य .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 अवद्भ्यः .
SFX 3575 Y 1
SFX 3575 0 तमेभ्यः .
SFX 3269 Y 1
SFX 3269 0 कारतः .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 वतीनाम् .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 आनाभिः .
SFX 1674 Y 1
SFX 1674 0 तव्यम् .
SFX 1702 Y 1
SFX 1702 0 तव्यौ .
SFX 4024 Y 1
SFX 4024 0 रणाय .
SFX 1586 Y 1
SFX 1586 0 आणयोः .
SFX 2533 Y 1
SFX 2533 0 अयावः .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 तीभिः .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 पतिम् .
SFX 435 Y 1
SFX 435 0 न्तीम् .
SFX 3487 Y 1
SFX 3487 0 दीपिका .
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 0 त्रोः .
SFX 3778 Y 1
SFX 3778 0 त्रैः .
SFX 4444 Y 1
SFX 4444 0 लक्षणेषु .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 माणतः .
SFX 1176 Y 1
SFX 1176 0 न्या .
SFX 2620 Y 1
SFX 2620 0 अयिष्यमाणायाम् .
SFX 3100 Y 1
SFX 3100 0 अयमानयोः .
SFX 1405 Y 1
SFX 1405 0 तयः .
SFX 4829 Y 1
SFX 4829 0 णितः .
SFX 4058 Y 1
SFX 4058 0 र्मभिः .
SFX 3836 Y 1
SFX 3836 0 वृत्तिभ्याम् .
SFX 4562 Y 1
SFX 4562 0 ष्याः .
SFX 4889 Y 1
SFX 4889 0 त्मा .
SFX 4960 Y 1
SFX 4960 0 ष्टतः .
SFX 376 Y 1
SFX 376 0 थ .
SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 0 थे .
SFX 1910 Y 1
SFX 1910 0 तव्यासु .
SFX 1605 Y 1
SFX 1605 0 याणाम् .
SFX 2003 Y 1
SFX 2003 0 यिष्यन् .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 0 यिष्यत् .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 0 इष्यन्त्यः .
SFX 2725 Y 1
SFX 2725 0 अणीयम् .
SFX 2719 Y 1
SFX 2719 0 अणीयौ .
SFX 3211 Y 1
SFX 3211 0 गाः .
SFX 3215 Y 1
SFX 3215 0 तरेभ्यः .
SFX 2276 Y 1
SFX 2276 0 टानाम् .
